Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.58.010

Locating corners and boundaries.

General laws shall govern the methods, procedures, and standards for surveying, establishing corners and boundaries, describing and perpetuating and recording information and descriptions relating thereto. The boundaries and corners of sections, parcels, plats, and subdivisions of land within a code city, may be surveyed, established, relocated, and perpetuated whenever a majority of the resident owners of any section or part or parts of any section of land within the city makes application in accordance with the provisions of chapter 58.04 RCW.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.58.010.]